Nevada, session 83, SB366.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. On or before October 1, 2025, the Department
of Health and Human Services shall determine the areas in this State
that have a shortage of type 34 providers.
2. On or before October 1, 2025, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall submit to the United States Secretary of
-
*SB366*

– 2 –
Health and Human Services a request to amend the Medicaid
program to increase the rate of reimbursement under Medicaid for:
(a) Each service provided by a type 14 provider or a type 34
provider by at least 3 percent of the rate of reimbursement for that
service on the effective date of this act;
(b) Each service described in paragraph (a) that is provided in a
community setting by at least an additional 3 percent of the rate of
reimbursement for that service on the effective date of this act;
(c) Each service described in paragraph (a) that is provided in
person in a county whose population is less than 100,000 by at least
an additional 3 percent of the rate of reimbursement for that service
on the effective date of this act;
(d) Each service that is provided by a type 14 provider in person
in a health professional shortage area for mental health by at least an
additional 3 percent of the rate of reimbursement for that service
provided on the effective date of this act; and
(e) Each service that is provided by a type 34 provider in person
in an area determined pursuant to subsection 1 to have a shortage of
type 34 providers by at least an additional 3 percent of the rate of
reimbursement for that service on the effective date of this act.
3. The request submitted pursuant to subsection 2 must be
supported using methods for determining reimbursement rates
accepted by the Secretary.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Community setting” includes a home, school, preschool,
daycare center for children or community center.
(b) “Health professional shortage area for mental health” means
an area that has been designated by the United States Secretary of
Health and Human Services as a health professional shortage area
for mental health pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 254e.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Type 14 provider” means a provider of health care who is
designated as provider type 14 in the “Provider Enrollment
Information Booklet” for Nevada Medicaid and Nevada Check Up
published by the Division of Health Care Financing and Policy of
the Department of Health and Human Services.
(e) “Type 34 provider” means a provider of health care who is
designated as provider type 34 in the “Provider Enrollment
Information Booklet” for Nevada Medicaid and Nevada Check Up
published by the Division of Health Care Financing and Policy of
the Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB366*